sl-SI: Podpora omrežne plasti: Sloj 2; Sloj 2+; Sloj 3; Sloj 3 lite; Sloj 4; Drugo
hr-HR: Podrška mrežnog sloja: Sloj 2; Sloj 2+; Sloj 3; Sloj 3 Lite; Sloj 4; Ostalo
en: Network layer support: Layer 2; Layer 2+; Layer 3; Layer 3 Lite; Layer 4; Other
nl: Netwerklaag ondersteuning: Laag 2; Laag 2+; Laag 3; Laag 3 Lite; Laag 4; Andere
fi: Verkkotason tuki: Taso 2; Taso 2+; Taso 3; Taso 3 Lite; Taso 4; Muu
hu: Hálózati réteg támogatása: 2. réteg; 2+ réteg; 3. réteg; 3. réteg Lite; 4. réteg; Egyéb
da: Understøttelse af netværkslag: Lag 2; Lag 2+; Lag 3; Lag 3 Lite; Lag 4; Andet
ru: Поддерживаемый сетевой уровень: Уровень 2; Уровень 2+; Уровень 3; Уровень 3 Lite; Уровень 4; Другой
el: Υποστήριξη επιπέδου δικτύου: Επίπεδο 2; Επίπεδο 2+; Επίπεδο 3; Επίπεδο 3 Lite; Επίπεδο 4; Άλλο
sk-SK: Sieťová podpora vrstvy: Vrstva 2; Vrstva 2+; Vrstva 3; Vrstva 3 Lite; Vrstva 4; Iné
pt-BR: Suporte de camada de rede: Camada 2; Camada 2+; Camada 3; Camada 3 Lite; Camada 4; Outro
it: Supporto del livello di rete: Layer 2; Layer 2+; Layer 3; Layer 3 Lite; Layer 4; Altro
de: Netzwerkschicht-Unterstützung: Layer 2; Layer 2+; Layer 3; Layer 3 Lite; Layer 4; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Поддръжка на мрежови слой: Слой 2; Слой 2+; Слой 3; Слой 3 лайт; Слой 4; Други
zh-TW: 網路層支援: 第 2 層; 第 2+ 層; 第 3 層; 第 3 層精簡版; 第 4 層; 其他
cs: Podpora síťové vrstvy: Vrstva 2; Vrstva 2+; Vrstva 3; Vrstva 3 Lite; Vrstva 4; Jiné
ro-RO: Suport pentru nivelul rețelei: Nivel 2; Nivel 2+; Nivel 3; Nivel 3 Lite; Nivel 4; Altele
lt-LT: Tinklo sluoksnio palaikymas: 2 sluoksnis; 2+ sluoksnis; 3 sluoksnis; 3 sluoksnis Lite; 4 sluoksnis; Kita
pt-PT: Suporte de camada de rede: Camada 2; Camada 2+; Camada 3; Camada 3 Lite; Camada 4; Outro
vi: Hỗ trợ lớp mạng: Lớp 2; Lớp 2+; Lớp 3; Lớp 3 Lite; Lớp 4; Khác
sv: Nätverkslagerstöd: Lager 2; Lager 2+; Lager 3; Lager 3 Lite; Lager 4; Övrigt
ja: ネットワークレイヤーサポート: レイヤー2; レイヤー2+; レイヤー3; レイヤー3ライト; レイヤー4; その他
fr: Prise en charge de la couche réseau: Couche 2; Couche 2+; Couche 3; Couche 3 Lite; Couche 4; Autre
es: Soporte de capa de red: Capa 2; Capa 2+; Capa 3; Capa 3 Lite; Capa 4; Otros
th: การรองรับชั้นเครือข่าย: เลเยอร์ 2; เลเยอร์ 2+; เลเยอร์ 3; เลเยอร์ 3 ไลท์; เลเยอร์ 4; อื่นๆ
pl: Obsługa warstwy sieciowej: Warstwa 2; Warstwa 2+; Warstwa 3; Warstwa 3 Lite; Warstwa 4; Inne
zh-CN: 网络层支持: 第 2 层; 第 2+ 层; 第 3 层; 第 3 层精简版; 第 4 层; 其他
ko: 네트워크 레이어 지원: 레이어 2; 레이어 2+; 레이어 3; 레이어 3 라이트; 레이어 4; 기타
tr: Ağ katmanı desteği: Katman 2; Katman 2+; Katman 3; Katman 3 Lite; Katman 4; Diğer
nb: Nettverkslagsstøtte: Lag 2; Lag 2+; Lag 3; Lag 3 Lite; Lag 4; Annet